src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-h26_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # h_
    tíðindi+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef: [tíðindi, tíðindir]
    tíðindi+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef: [tíðindi, tíðindir]
    tíðindi+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef: tíðindum
    tíðindi+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef: tíðinda
    tíðindi+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def: tíðindini
    tíðindi+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def: tíðindini
    tíðindi+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def: tíðindunum
    tíðindi+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def: tíðindanna
